Utah statutes.
63J-1-207.   Uniform School Fund -- Appropriations.

(1)  Appropriations made from the General Fund to the Uniform School Fund to assist in financing the state's portion of the minimum school program, as provided by law, shall be conditioned upon available revenue.

(2)  If revenues to the General Fund are not sufficient to permit transfers to the Uniform School Fund as provided by appropriation, the state fiscal officers shall withhold transfers from the General Fund to the Uniform School Fund during the fiscal period, as in their judgment the available revenues justify until:

(a)  all other appropriations made by law have been provided for;

(b)  any modifications to department and agency work programs have been made; and

(c)  the governor has approved the transfer.

(3)  Transfers from the General Fund to the Uniform School Fund shall be made at such times as required to equalize the property levy for each fiscal year.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

